Hawaii statutes.
[§421J-3.5 Notice required;
regular annual and special meetings.] (a) Not less than fourteen days in
advance of any regular annual meeting or special meeting of an association, the
secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall give written notice of
the meeting to each member of the association as provided in the bylaws of the
association or by two or more of the following means:

(1) Hand delivery;

(2) United States mail sent to the mailing address of
each unit or to another mailing address designated in writing by the
association member;

(3) Electronic mail to the electronic mailing address
designated in writing by the association member; or

(4) Posting of the meeting notice in its entirety on
a portion of the association's website that is accessible to all members.

(b) Notice pursuant to this section shall
state:

(1) The date, time, and place of the meeting; and

(2) The items on the agenda, including the general
nature of and rationale for any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws;
any proposal for a special assessment, unless the authority for a special
assessment is otherwise provided for in the association's governing documents;
and any proposal to remove a member of the board.

(c) The requirements of this section shall not
be interpreted to preclude any association member from proposing an amendment
to the declaration or bylaws or proposing to remove a member of the board at an
association meeting.

(d) The requirements of this section shall not
be interpreted to apply to any board meetings or committee meetings of a
planned community association. [L 2013, c 188, §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next